New York, session 2025-2026, S801.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 17-a of the executive law, as added by a chap- 2 ter of the laws of 2024 amending the executive law relating to requiring 3 new construction that includes dedicated off-street parking to provide 4 electric vehicle charging stations and electric vehicle ready parking 5 spaces, as proposed in legislative bills numbers S. 1736-E and A. 6 3780-E, is REPEALED. 7 § 2. Section 11-104 of the energy law is amended by adding a new 8 subdivision 9 to read as follows: 9 9. Standards to require new buildings that include new dedicated off- 10 street parking involving a garage, driveway, parking lot or other off- 11 street parking to have electric vehicle ready infrastructure and elec- 12 tric vehicle charging stations that comply with the requirements set 13 forth in this subdivision. Such standards shall not be included in the 14 life cycle analysis performed pursuant to subdivision two of section 15 11-103 of this article. 16 (a) For the purposes of this subdivision: 17 (i) "electric vehicle ready infrastructure" shall mean all electrical 18 components, terminating in a receptacle or outlet, as necessary to 19 enable electric vehicle charging and support electric vehicle charging 20 stations; and EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02803-01-5 S. 801 2 1 (ii) "electric vehicle charging station" shall mean all the equipment 2 necessary to deliver electricity from a source outside an electric vehi- 3 cle into one or more electric vehicles, as defined by the code council. 4 (b) When adopting a new code after December thirty-first, two thousand 5 twenty-six, such code shall include provisions that require any new 6 building where new off-street parking is associated with such new build- 7 ing to have electric vehicle ready infrastructure and electric vehicle 8 charging stations in accordance with paragraph (d) of this subdivision. 9 (c) The provisions set forth in paragraph (b) of this subdivision 10 shall not be construed as applying to buildings existing prior to the 11 adoption of a new code after December thirty-first, two thousand twen- 12 ty-six, including to the repair, alteration, addition, relocation, or 13 change of occupancy or use of such buildings. 14 (d) Code provisions promulgated by the state fire prevention and 15 building code council pursuant to this subdivision: 16 (i) may, for detached one- and two-family dwellings, provide for elec- 17 tric vehicle ready infrastructure; 18 (ii) shall, for occupancies other than detached one- and two-family 19 dwellings, require a minimum number of parking spaces with electric 20 vehicle ready infrastructure and a minimum number of parking spaces with 21 electric vehicle charging stations, with minimum charging capacity stan- 22 dards established by the council. When establishing minimum standards, 23 the council shall consider: 24 A. the goals of section 19-0306-b of the environmental conservation 25 law; 26 B. the differing needs of various building types; 27 C. maximizing equity of access to electric vehicle charging across 28 income levels, housing types, geographic locations, and employment 29 types; 30 D. for commercial buildings, the electric vehicle charging access 31 needs of both employees and customers; and 32 E. for multi-family residential buildings, standards that allow elec- 33 tric vehicle charging stations be wired directly to a meter or electric 34 vehicle submeter serving a residential unit; 35 (iii) include requirements for clear and prominent signage denoting 36 the availability and location of electric vehicle ready infrastructure 37 and electric vehicle charging stations; and 38 (iv) provide exemptions to such code provisions for: 39 A. projects with local, state, or federal approval subject to an actu- 40 al or anticipated agreement with a local, state, or federal governmental 41 entity for the purposes of providing affordable housing in a given 42 locality or region; and 43 B. additional exemptions due to technical infeasibility, geographic 44 location, or building type, as the code council deems appropriate. 45 § 3. This act shall take effect on the same date and in the same 46 manner as a chapter of the laws of 2024 amending the executive law 47 relating to requiring new construction that includes dedicated off- 48 street parking to provide electric vehicle charging stations and elec- 49 tric vehicle ready parking spaces, as proposed in legislative bills 50 numbers S. 1736-E and A. 3780-E, take effect.